Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB415.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the Conservation and Natural Resources Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 323. Suicide prevention.The department shall prominently post signage in all State parks and State forests in visitor entrances, parking lots and highly trafficked areas providing for information regarding <--12345678910111213141516171819202122 suicide awareness and the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline . Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), ENTITLED "AN ACT PROVIDING FOR AND REORGANIZING THE CONDUCT OF THE EXECUTIVE AND ADMINISTRATIVE WORK OF THE COMMONWEALTH BY THE EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT THEREOF AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE DEPARTMENTS, BOARDS, COMMISSIONS, AND OFFICERS THEREOF, INCLUDING THE BOARDS OF TRUSTEES OF STATE NORMAL SCHOOLS, OR TEACHERS COLLEGES; ABOLISHING, CREATING, REORGANIZING OR AUTHORIZING THE REORGANIZATION OF CERTAIN ADMINISTRATIVE DEPARTMENTS, BOARDS, AND COMMISSIONS; DEFINING THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE GOVERNOR AND OTHER EXECUTIVE AND ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICERS, AND OF THE SEVERAL ADMINISTRATIVE DEPARTMENTS, BOARDS, COMMISSIONS, AND OFFICERS; FIXING THE SALARIES OF THE GOVERNOR, LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR, AND CERTAIN OTHER EXECUTIVE AND ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICERS; PROVIDING FOR THE APPOINTMENT OF CERTAIN ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICERS, AND OF ALL DEPUTIES AND OTHER ASSISTANTS AND EMPLOYES IN CERTAIN DEPARTMENTS, BOARDS, AND COMMISSIONS; PROVIDING FOR JUDICIAL ADMINISTRATION; AND PRESCRIBING THE MANNER IN WHICH THE NUMBER AND COMPENSATION OF THE DEPUTIES AND ALL OTHER ASSISTANTS AND EMPLOYES OF CERTAIN DEPARTMENTS, BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS SHALL BE DETERMINED," IN POWERS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES, PROVIDING FOR SUICIDE PREVENTION.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1904-B. SUICIDE PREVENTION.THE DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES SHALL PROMINENTLY POST SIGNAGE IN ALL STATE PARKS AND STATE FORESTS IN VISITOR ENTRANCES, PARKING LOTS AND HIGHLY TRAFFICKED AREAS PROVIDING FOR INFORMATION REGARDING SUICIDE AWARENESS AND THE 988 SUICIDE AND CRISIS LIFELINE.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250HB0415PN1830 - 2 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031323334353637